Utah statutes.
17-50-331.   Regulation of sexually oriented business.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Adult service" means dancing, serving food or beverages, modeling,
posing, wrestling, singing, reading, talking, listening, or other performances
or activities conducted by a nude or partially denuded individual for
compensation.
(b)  "Compensation" means:
(i)  a salary;
(ii)  a fee;
(iii)  a commission;
(iv)  employment;
(v)  a profit; or
(vi)  other pecuniary gain.
(c) (i)  "Escort" means a person who, for compensation, dates, socializes
with, visits, consorts with, or accompanies another, or offers to date,
consort with, socialize with, visit, or accompany another:
(A)  to a social affair, entertainment, or a place of amusement; or
(B)  within:
(I)  a place of public or private resort;
(II)  a business or commercial establishment; or
(III)  a private quarter.
(ii)  "Escort" does not mean a person who provides business or personal
services, including:
(A)  a licensed private nurse;
(B)  an aide for the elderly or a person with a disability;
(C)  a social secretary or similar service personnel:
(I)  whose relationship with a patron is characterized by a contractual
relationship having a duration of 12 hours or more; and
(II)  who provides a service not principally characterized as dating or
socializing; or
(D)  a person who provides services such as singing telegrams, birthday
greetings, or similar activities:
(I)  characterized by an appearance in a public place;
(II)  contracted for by a party other than the person for whom the service is
being performed; and
(III)  of a duration not to exceed one hour.
(d)  "Escort service" means any person who furnishes or arranges for an escort
to accompany another individual for compensation.
(e)  "Nude or partially denuded individual" means an individual with any of
the following less than completely and opaquely covered:
(i)  genitals;
(ii)  the pubic region; or
(iii)  a female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola.
(f) (i)  "Sexually oriented business" means a business at which any nude or
partially denuded individual, regardless of whether the nude or partially
denuded individual is an employee of the sexually oriented business or an
independent contractor, performs any service for compensation.
(ii)  "Sexually oriented business" includes:
(A)  an escort service; or
(B)  an adult service.
(2)  A person employed in a sexually oriented business may not work in the
unincorporated area of a county:
(a)  if the county requires that a person employed in a sexually oriented
business be licensed individually; and
(b)  if the person is not licensed by the county.
(3)  A business entity that conducts a sexually oriented business may not
conduct business in an unincorporated area of a county:
(a)  if the county requires that a sexually oriented business be licensed; and
(b)  if the business entity is not licensed by the county.
